test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_aigi_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - siergi: # ok  
    siergi+N+Sg+Nom:   siergi
    siergi+N+Sg+Gen:   siergi
    siergi+N+Sg+Acc:   siergi
    siergi+N+Sg+Ill:   siärgán
    siergi+N+Sg+Loc:   siergist
    siergi+N+Sg+Com:   siergijn
    siergi+N+Sg+Abe:   siergittáá
    siergi+N+Ess:      siergin
    siergi+N+Par:      siergid
    siergi+N+Pl+Nom:   siergih
    siergi+N+Pl+Gen:  [siergij, siergij]
    siergi+N+Pl+Acc:   siergijd
    siergi+N+Pl+Ill:   siergijd
    siergi+N+Pl+Loc:   siergijn
    siergi+N+Pl+Com:   siergijguin
    siergi+N+Pl+Abe:   siergijttáá

  Noun - sieidi: # ok AIGI
    sieidi+N+Sg+Nom:   sieidi
    sieidi+N+Sg+Gen:   sieidi
    sieidi+N+Sg+Acc:   sieidi
    sieidi+N+Sg+Ill:   siäidán
    sieidi+N+Sg+Loc:   sieidist
    sieidi+N+Sg+Com:   sieidijn
    sieidi+N+Sg+Abe:   sieidittáá
    sieidi+N+Ess:      sieidin
    sieidi+N+Par:      sieidid
    sieidi+N+Pl+Nom:   sieidih
    sieidi+N+Pl+Gen:  [sieidij, sieidij]
    sieidi+N+Pl+Acc:   sieidijd
    sieidi+N+Pl+Ill:   sieidijd
    sieidi+N+Pl+Loc:   sieidijn
    sieidi+N+Pl+Com:   sieidijguin
    sieidi+N+Pl+Abe:   sieidijttáá

  Noun - veerdi: # ok AIGI 
    veerdi+N+Sg+Nom:   veerdi
    veerdi+N+Sg+Gen:   veerdi
    veerdi+N+Sg+Acc:   veerdi
    veerdi+N+Sg+Ill:   viärdán
    veerdi+N+Sg+Loc:   veerdist
    veerdi+N+Sg+Com:   verdijn
    veerdi+N+Sg+Abe:   verdittáá
    veerdi+N+Ess:      veerdin
    veerdi+N+Par:      veerdid
    veerdi+N+Pl+Nom:   veerdih
    veerdi+N+Pl+Gen:  [veerdij, verdij]
    veerdi+N+Pl+Acc:   veerdijd
    veerdi+N+Pl+Ill:   verdijd
    veerdi+N+Pl+Loc:   veerdijn
    veerdi+N+Pl+Com:   verdijguin
    veerdi+N+Pl+Abe:   verdijttáá
   

  Noun - pyeidi: # ok AIGI
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Nom:   pyeidi
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Gen:   pyeidi
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Acc:   pyeidi
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Ill:   puáidán
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Loc:   pyeidist
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Com:   puoidijn
    pyeidi+N+Sg+Abe:   pyeidittáá
    pyeidi+N+Ess:      pyeidin
    pyeidi+N+Par:      pyeidid
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Nom:   pyeidih
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Gen:  [puoidij, puoidij]
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Acc:   puoidijd
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Ill:   puoidijd
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Loc:   puoidijn
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Com:   puoidijguin
    pyeidi+N+Pl+Abe:   puoidijttáá

  Noun - kyeimi: # ok AIGI
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Nom:   kyeimi
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Gen:   kyeimi
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Acc:   kyeimi
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Ill:   kuáimán
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Loc:   kyeimist
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Com:   kuoimijn
    kyeimi+N+Sg+Abe:   kyeimittáá
    kyeimi+N+Ess:      kyeimin
    kyeimi+N+Par:      kyeimid
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Nom:   kyeimih
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuoimij, kuoimij]
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Acc:   kuoimijd
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Ill:   kuoimijd
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Loc:   kuoimijn
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Com:   kuoimijguin
    kyeimi+N+Pl+Abe:   kuoimijttáá

  Noun - syeini: # ok AIGI
    syeini+N+Sg+Nom:   syeini
    syeini+N+Sg+Gen:   syeini
    syeini+N+Sg+Acc:   syeini
    syeini+N+Sg+Ill:   suáinán
    syeini+N+Sg+Loc:   syeinist
    syeini+N+Sg+Com:   suoinijn
    syeini+N+Sg+Abe:   syeinittáá
    syeini+N+Ess:      syeinin
    syeini+N+Par:      syeinid
    syeini+N+Pl+Nom:   syeinih
    syeini+N+Pl+Gen:  [suoinij, suoinij]
    syeini+N+Pl+Acc:   suoinijd
    syeini+N+Pl+Ill:   suoinijd
    syeini+N+Pl+Loc:   suoinijn
    syeini+N+Pl+Com:   suoinijguin
    syeini+N+Pl+Abe:   suoinijttáá

  Noun - nuáidi: # ok AIGI
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Nom:   nuáidi
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Gen:   nuáidi
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Acc:   nuáidi
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Ill:   nuáidán
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Loc:   nuáidist
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Com:   noidijn
    nuáidi+N+Sg+Abe:   nuáidittáá
    nuáidi+N+Ess:      nuáidin
    nuáidi+N+Par:      nuáidid
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Nom:   nuáidih
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Gen:  [nooidij, noidij]
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Acc:   nooidijd
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Ill:   noidijd
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Loc:   nooidijn
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Com:   noidijguin
    nuáidi+N+Pl+Abe:   noidijttáá

  Noun - cuápci: # ok AIGI
    cuápci+N+Sg+Nom:   cuápci
    cuápci+N+Sg+Gen:   cuápci
    cuápci+N+Sg+Acc:   cuápci
    cuápci+N+Sg+Ill:   cuápcán
    cuápci+N+Sg+Loc:   cuápcist
    cuápci+N+Sg+Com:   copcijn
    cuápci+N+Sg+Abe:   cuápcittáá
    cuápci+N+Ess:      cuápcin
    cuápci+N+Par:      cuápcid
    cuápci+N+Pl+Nom:   cuápcih
    cuápci+N+Pl+Gen:   [coopcij, copcij]
    cuápci+N+Pl+Acc:   coopcijd
    cuápci+N+Pl+Ill:   copcijd
    cuápci+N+Pl+Loc:   coopcijn
    cuápci+N+Pl+Com:   copcijguin
    cuápci+N+Pl+Abe:   copcijttáá

  Noun - uábbi: # ok AIGI
    uábbi+N+Sg+Nom:   uábbi
    uábbi+N+Sg+Gen:   uábi
    uábbi+N+Sg+Acc:   uábi
    uábbi+N+Sg+Ill:   uábán
    uábbi+N+Sg+Loc:   uábist
    uábbi+N+Sg+Com:   obbijn
    uábbi+N+Sg+Abe:   uábittáá
    uábbi+N+Ess:      uábbin
    uábbi+N+Par:      uábbid
    uábbi+N+Pl+Nom:   uábih
    uábbi+N+Pl+Gen:  [oobij, obij]
    uábbi+N+Pl+Acc:   oobijd
    uábbi+N+Pl+Ill:   obbijd
    uábbi+N+Pl+Loc:   oobijn
    uábbi+N+Pl+Com:   obijguin
    uábbi+N+Pl+Abe:   obijttáá
    
  Noun - jyelgi: # ok  
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Nom:   jyelgi
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Gen:   jyelgi
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Acc:   jyelgi
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Ill:   juálgán
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Loc:   jyelgist
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Com:   juolgijn
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Abe:   jyelgittáá
    jyelgi+N+Ess:      jyelgin
    jyelgi+N+Par:      jyelgid
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Nom:   jyelgih
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Gen:  [juolgij, juolgij]
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Acc:   juolgijd
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Ill:   juolgijd
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Loc:   juolgijn
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Com:   juolgijguin
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Abe:   juolgijttáá

  Noun - syergi: # ok  
    syergi+N+Sg+Nom:   syergi
    syergi+N+Sg+Gen:   syergi
    syergi+N+Sg+Acc:   syergi
    syergi+N+Sg+Ill:   suárgán
    syergi+N+Sg+Loc:   syergist
    syergi+N+Sg+Com:   suorgijn
    syergi+N+Sg+Abe:   syergittáá
    syergi+N+Ess:      syergin
    syergi+N+Par:      syergid
    syergi+N+Pl+Nom:   syergih
    syergi+N+Pl+Gen:  [suorgij, suorgij]
    syergi+N+Pl+Acc:   suorgijd
    syergi+N+Pl+Ill:   suorgijd
    syergi+N+Pl+Loc:   suorgijn
    syergi+N+Pl+Com:   suorgijguin
    syergi+N+Pl+Abe:   suorgijttáá

  Noun - lyevdi: # ok  
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Nom:   lyevdi
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Gen:   lyevdi
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Acc:   lyevdi
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Ill:   luávdán
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Loc:   lyevdist
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Com:   luovdijn
    lyevdi+N+Sg+Abe:   lyevdittáá
    lyevdi+N+Ess:      lyevdin
    lyevdi+N+Par:      lyevdid
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Nom:   lyevdih
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Gen:  [luovdij, luovdij]
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Acc:   luovdijd
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Ill:   luovdijd
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Loc:   luovdijn
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Com:   luovdijguin
    lyevdi+N+Pl+Abe:   luovdijttáá


  Noun - uási: # i-stems - ok
    uási+N+Sg+Nom: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Gen: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Acc: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Ill: uásán
    uási+N+Sg+Loc: uásist
    uási+N+Sg+Com: ossijn
    uási+N+Sg+Abe: uásittáá
    uási+N+Ess: uássin
    uási+N+Par: uássid
    uási+N+Pl+Nom: uásih
    uási+N+Pl+Gen: [oosij, osij]
    uási+N+Pl+Acc: oosijd
    uási+N+Pl+Ill: ossijd
    uási+N+Pl+Loc: oosijn
    uási+N+Pl+Com: osijguin
    uási+N+Pl+Abe: osijttáá

  Noun - pälkki: # 
    pälkki+N+Sg+Nom: pälkki
    pälkki+N+Sg+Gen: päälhi
    pälkki+N+Sg+Acc: päälhi
    pälkki+N+Sg+Ill: páálkán
    pälkki+N+Sg+Loc: päälhist
    pälkki+N+Sg+Com: palhijn
    pälkki+N+Sg+Abe: pälhittáá
    pälkki+N+Ess: pälkkin
    pälkki+N+Par: pälkkid
    pälkki+N+Pl+Nom: päälhih
    pälkki+N+Pl+Gen: [paalhij, palhij]
    pälkki+N+Pl+Acc: paalhijd
    pälkki+N+Pl+Ill: palhijd
    pälkki+N+Pl+Loc: paalhijn
    pälkki+N+Pl+Com: palhijguin
    pälkki+N+Pl+Abe: palhijttáá
